apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="trib/ù__n">
    <e><p><l>ù</l><r>ù<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ujiet</l><r>ù<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="wegħd/a__n">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iet</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="istampa__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/student__n_m">
    <e><p><l>student</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>istudenti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>studenti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="protestant__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="propost/a__n_f">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="bojkot/t__n">
    <e><p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l></l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ts</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="b/andiera__n_f">
    <e><p><l>andiera</l><r>andiera<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nadar</l><r>andiera<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Taljan__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="dixx__n_m">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/tifel__n_m">
    <e><p><l>tifel</l><r>tifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tfal</l><r>tifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>subien</l><r>tifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="xemgħa__n_f">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tejn</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="q/attus__n_m">
    <e><p><l>attus</l><r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tates</l><r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="mogħ/ża__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ża</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oż</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="t/abib__n_m">
    <e><p><l>abib</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>obba</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="buff/u__n_m">
    <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="x/offa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>offa</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ufftejn</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ċ/erv__n_m">
    <e><p><l>erv</l><r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riev</l><r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="siġġ/u__n_m">
    <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ġ/urnata__n_f">
    <e><p><l>urnata</l><r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ranet</l><r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="l/eħen__n_m">
    <e><p><l>eħen</l><r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iħna</l><r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="nagħ/ġa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aġ</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="moviment__n_m">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ispettur__n_mf">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="għas/fur__n_m">
    <e><p><l>fur</l><r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>afar</l><r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="t/arbija__n_f">
    <e><p><l>arbija</l><r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rabi</l><r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="pjanet/a__n_m"> <!-- pjaneta massiv, pjaneta giganteska -->
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="b/eżżula__n_f">
    <e><p><l>eżżula</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żieżel</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="att/riċi__n_f">
    <e><p><l>riċi</l><r>riċi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uri</l><r>riċi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ż/iemel__n_m">
    <e><p><l>iemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="s/ultan__n">
    <e><p><l>ultan</l><r>ultan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ultana</l><r>ultan<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>laten</l><r>ultan<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- mf? -->
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="sid__n_m">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ien</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Ċek__n_GD">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Ċek__n_m">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="oxx__n_f">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="baħri__n_m">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <!-- Broken plural nouns -->
  <pardef n="ġ/nien__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>nien</l><r>nien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>onna</l><r>nien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="far/xa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>xa</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ax</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/aħrax__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aħrax</l><r>aħrax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ħorox</l><r>aħrax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/emx__n_f">
    <e><p><l>emx</l><r>emx<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mux</l><r>emx<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/arid__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arid</l><r>arid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>orda</l><r>arid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/andul__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>andul</l><r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nadel</l><r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niedel</l><r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="plott" c="plot"><i>plott</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="piż" c="weight"><i>piż</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bandiera" c="flag"><i>b</i><par n="b/andiera__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="student"><i></i><par n="/student__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="norma"><i>norm</i><par n="propost/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="droga" c="drug"><i>drog</i><par n="pjanet/a__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ispettur" c="inspector"><i>ispettur</i><par n="ispettur__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurnal"><i>ġurnal</i><par n="protestant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ispostament"><i>ispostament</i><par n="protestant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protest"><i>protest</i><par n="protestant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grupp" c="group"><i>grupp</i><par n="moviment__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="wegħda"><i>wegħd</i><par n="wegħd/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tribù"><i>trib</i><par n="trib/ù__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bojkott"><i>bojkot</i><par n="bojkot/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="istampa"><i>istampa</i><par n="istampa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mammiferu"><i>mammifer</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Taljan"><i>Taljan</i><par n="Taljan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ġermaniż"><i>Ġermaniż</i><par n="Taljan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurnata"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/urnata__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaneta"><i>pjanet</i><par n="pjanet/a__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="segretarju"><i>segretarj</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tifel" c="boy"><i></i><par n="/tifel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="premju"><i>premj</i><par n="siġġ/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="siġġu"><i>siġġ</i><par n="siġġ/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tabib"><i>t</i><par n="t/abib__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tarbija" c="baby"><i>t</i><par n="t/arbija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attriċi"><i>att</i><par n="att/riċi__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żiemel"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/iemel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="qattus"><i>q</i><par n="q/attus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerv"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erv__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="xoffa" c="lip"><i>x</i><par n="x/offa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħsara" c="mischief"><i>ħsara</i><par n="xemgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nagħġa"><i>nagħ</i><par n="nagħ/ġa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mogħża"><i>mogħ</i><par n="mogħ/ża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leħen" c="voice"><i>l</i><par n="l/eħen__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kaptan"><i>kaptan</i><par n="Taljan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula"><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula"><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħadid"><i>ħadid</i><par n="Ċek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġranet"><i>ġranet</i><par n="Ċek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tobba"><i>tobba</i><par n="Ċek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħuta"><i>ħuta</i><par n="oxx__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="matematiku"><i>matematiku</i><par n="Ċek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="deżerti"><i>deżerti</i><par n="Ċek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baħri"><i>baħri</i><par n="baħri__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zokkor"><i>zokkor</i><par n="Ċek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ċeka"><i>Ċeka</i><par n="oxx__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="intervista"><i>intervist</i><par n="propost/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sultan" c="king"><i>s</i><par n="s/ultan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sid" c="king"><i>sid</i><par n="sid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="karru"><i>karr</i><par n="siġġ/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prezz"><i>prezz</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="servizz"><i>servizz</i><par n="moviment__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="idea"><i>idea</i><par n="xemgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="konsegwenza"><i>konsegwenz</i><par n="propost/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="parir"><i>parir</i><par n="moviment__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="perjodu"><i>perjod</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="xewqa"><i>xewqa</i><par n="xemgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għasfur" c="bird" ><i>għas</i><par n="għas/fur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aħrax" c="harsh" ><i></i><par n="/aħrax__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="marid" c="sick person" ><i>m</i><par n="m/arid__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xemx" c="sun" ><i>x</i><par n="x/emx__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="farxa" c="wooden shelf" ><i>far</i><par n="far/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġnien" c="garden" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/nien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qandul" c="something that is removed from one place to another with difficulty" ><i>q</i><par n="q/andul__n_GD"/></e>
